New York, session 2025-2026, S7193.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 730 of the laws of 2019, amending the 2 executive law relating to the authority of the New York black car opera- 3 tors' injury compensation fund, inc., as amended by chapter 417 of the 4 laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed [six] nine years after such date. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11428-01-5